New Jersey, session 222, S1807.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.): a.     "Gross revenue" means annual gross revenue or gross shelter rent or annual gross rents, as appropriate, and other income, for each urban renewal entity designated pursuant to P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.).  The financial agreement shall establish the method of computing gross revenue for the entity, and the method of determining insurance, operating and maintenance expenses paid by a tenant which are ordinarily paid by a landlord, which shall be included in the gross revenue; provided, however, that any federal funds received, whether directly or in the form of rental subsidies paid to tenants, by a nonprofit corporation that is the sponsor of a qualified subsidized housing project, shall not be included in the gross revenue of the project for purposes of computing the annual [services] service charge for [municipal] public services supplied to the project; and provided further that any gain realized by the urban renewal entity on the sale of any unit in fee simple, whether or not taxable under federal or State law, shall not be included in computing gross revenue. b.    "Limited-dividend entity" means an urban renewal entity incorporated pursuant to Title 14A of the New Jersey Statutes, or established pursuant to Title 42 of the Revised Statutes, for which the profits and the entity are limited as follows.  The allowable net profits of the entity shall be determined by applying the allowable profit rate to each total project unit cost, if the project is undertaken in units, or the total project cost, if the project is not undertaken in units, and all capital costs, determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, of any other entity whose revenue is included in the computation of excess profits, for the period commencing on the date on which the construction of the unit or project is completed, and terminating at the close of the fiscal year of the entity preceding the date on which the computation is made, where: "Allowable profit rate" means the greater of 12% or the percentage per annum arrived at by adding 1 1/4% to the annual interest percentage rate payable on the entity's initial permanent mortgage financing.  If the initial permanent mortgage is insured or guaranteed by a governmental agency, the mortgage insurance premium or similar charge, if payable on a per annum basis, shall be considered as interest for this purpose.  If there is no permanent mortgage financing the allowable profit rate shall be the greater of 12% or the percentage per annum arrived at by adding 1 1/4% per annum to the interest rate per annum which the municipality determines to be the prevailing rate on mortgage financing on comparable improvements in the county. c.     "Net profit" means the gross revenues of the urban renewal entity less all operating and non-operating expenses of the entity, all determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, but: (1)   there shall be included in expenses: (a) all annual service charges paid pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-12); (b) all payments to the municipality of excess profits pursuant to section 15 or 16 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-15 or 40A:20-16); (c) an annual amount sufficient to amortize the total project cost and all capital costs determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, of any other entity whose revenue is included in the computation of excess profits, over the term of the abatement as set forth in the financial agreement; (d) all reasonable annual operating expenses of the urban renewal entity and any other entity whose revenue is included in the computation of excess profits, including the cost of all management fees, brokerage commissions, insurance premiums, all taxes or service charges paid, legal, accounting, or other professional service fees, utilities, building maintenance costs, building and office supplies, and payments into repair or maintenance reserve accounts; (e) all payments of rent including, but not limited to, ground rent by the urban renewal entity; (f) all debt service; (2)   there shall not be included in expenses either depreciation or obsolescence, interest on debt, except interest which is part of debt service, income taxes, or salaries, bonuses or other compensation paid, directly or indirectly to directors, officers and stockholders of the entity, or officers, partners or other persons holding any proprietary ownership interest in the entity. The urban renewal entity shall provide to the municipality an annual audited statement which clearly identifies the calculation of net profit for the urban renewal entity during the previous year.  The annual audited statement shall be prepared by a certified public accountant and shall be submitted to the municipality within 90 days of the close of the fiscal year. d.    "Nonprofit entity" means an urban renewal entity incorporated pursuant to Title 15A of the New Jersey Statutes for which no part of its net profits inures to the benefit of its members. e.     "Project" means any work or undertaking pursuant to a redevelopment plan adopted pursuant to the "Local Redevelopment and Housing Law," P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-1 et al.), which has as its purpose the redevelopment of all or any part of a redevelopment area including any industrial, commercial, residential or other use, and may include any buildings, land, including demolition, clearance or removal of buildings from land, equipment, facilities, or other real or personal properties which are necessary, convenient, or desirable appurtenances, such as, but not limited to, streets, sewers, utilities, parks, site preparation, landscaping, and administrative, community, health, recreational, educational and welfare facilities, and zero-emission vehicle fueling and charging infrastructure. f.     "Redevelopment area" means an area determined to be in need of redevelopment and for which a redevelopment plan has been adopted by a municipality pursuant to the "Local Redevelopment and Housing Law," P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-1 et al.). g.    "Urban renewal entity" means a limited-dividend entity, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority or a nonprofit entity which enters into a financial agreement pursuant to P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.) with a municipality to undertake a project pursuant to a redevelopment plan for the redevelopment of all or any part of a redevelopment area, or a project necessary, useful, or convenient for the relocation of residents displaced or to be displaced by the redevelopment of all or any part of one or more redevelopment areas, or a low and moderate income housing project. h.    "Total project unit cost" or "total project cost" means the aggregate of the following items as related to a unit of a project, if the project is undertaken in units, or to the total project, if the project is not undertaken in units, all of which as limited by, and approved as part of the financial agreement: (1) cost of the land and improvements to the entity, whether acquired from a private or a public owner, with cost in the case of leasehold interests to be computed by capitalizing the aggregate rental at a rate provided in the financial agreement; (2) architect, engineer and attorney fees, paid or payable by the entity in connection with the planning, construction and financing of the project; (3) surveying and testing charges in connection therewith; (4) actual construction costs which the entity shall cause to be certified and verified to the municipality and the municipal governing body by an independent and qualified architect, including the cost of any preparation of the site undertaken at the entity's expense; (5) insurance, interest and finance costs during construction; (6) costs of obtaining initial permanent financing; (7) commissions and other expenses paid or payable in connection with initial leasing; (8) real estate taxes and assessments during the construction period; (9) a developer's overhead based on a percentage of actual construction costs, to be computed at not more than the following schedule: $500,000 or less  -                             10% $500,000 through $1,000,000     -    $50,000 plus 8% on excess above $500,000 $1,000,001 through $2,000,000   -   $90,000 plus 7% on excess above $1,000,000 $2,000,001 through $3,500,000   -   $160,000 plus 5.6667% on excess above $2,000,000 $3,500,001 through $5,500,000   -   $245,000 plus 4.25% on excess above $3,500,000 $5,500,001 through $10,000,000  -  $330,000 plus 3.7778% on excess above $5,500,000 over $10,000,000    -             5% If the project includes units in fee simple, with respect to those units, "total project cost" shall mean the sales price of the individual housing unit which shall be the most recent true consideration paid for a deed to the unit in fee simple in a bona fide arm's length sales transaction, but not less than the assessed valuation of the unit in fee simple assessed at 100 percent of true value. If the financial agreement so provides, there shall be excluded from the total project cost: (1) actual costs incurred by the entity and certified to the municipality by an independent and qualified architect or engineer which are associated with site remediation and cleanup of environmentally hazardous materials or contaminants in accordance with State or federal law; and (2) any extraordinary costs incurred by the entity and certified to the chief financial officer of the municipality by an independent certified public accountant in order to alleviate blight conditions within the area in need of redevelopment including, but not limited to, the cost of demolishing structures considered by the entity to be an impediment to the proposed redevelopment of the property, costs associated with the relocation or removal of public utility facilities as defined pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-10) considered necessary in order to implement the redevelopment plan, costs associated with the relocation of residents or businesses displaced or to be displaced by the proposed redevelopment, and the clearing of title to properties within the area in need of redevelopment in order to facilitate redevelopment. i.     "Housing project" means any work or undertaking to provide decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings for families in need of housing; the undertaking may include any buildings, land (including demolition, clearance or removal of buildings from land), equipment, facilities, or other real or personal properties or interests therein which are necessary, convenient or desirable appurtenances of the undertaking, such as, but not limited to, streets, sewers, water, utilities, parks; site preparation; landscaping, and administrative, community, health, recreational, educational, welfare, commercial, or other facilities, or to provide any part or combination of the foregoing. j.     "Redevelopment relocation housing project" means a housing project which is necessary, useful or convenient for the relocation of residents displaced by redevelopment of all or any part of one or more redevelopment areas. k.    "Low and moderate income housing project" means a housing project which is occupied, or is to be occupied, exclusively by households whose incomes do not exceed income limitations established pursuant to any State or federal housing program. l.     "Qualified subsidized housing project" means a low and moderate income housing project owned by a nonprofit corporation organized under the provisions of Title 15A of the New Jersey Statutes for the purpose of developing, constructing and operating rental housing for senior citizens under section 202 of Pub.L. 86-372 (12 U.S.C. s.1701q) or rental housing for persons with disabilities under section 811 of Pub.L. 101-625 (42 U.S.C. s.8013), or under any other federal program that the Commissioner of Community Affairs by rule may determine to be of a similar nature and purpose. m.   "Debt service" means the amount required to make annual payments of principal and interest or the equivalent thereof on any construction mortgage, permanent mortgage or other financing including returns on institutional equity financing and market rate related party debt for a project for a period equal to the term of the tax exemption granted by a financial agreement. n.    "Zero-emission vehicle" means a vehicle certified as a zero emission vehicle pursuant to the California Air Resources Board zero emission vehicle standards for the applicable model year, including but not limited to, battery electric-powered vehicles and hydrogen fuel cell vehicles. o.    "Zero-emission vehicle fueling and charging infrastructure" means infrastructure to charge or fuel zero-emission vehicles, including but not limited to, public electric vehicle charging stations and public hydrogen fueling stations. p.    "Chief executive officer of the county" means the county executive, county manager, county supervisor, or president of the board of chosen freeholders, as appropriate to the form of government of a county. (cf: P.L.2021, c.168, s.4) 2.    Section 8 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-8) is amended to read as follows: 8.    Every urban renewal entity qualifying under [this act] P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.), before proceeding with any projects, shall make written application to the municipality for approval thereof, and shall provide copies of the application, for informational purposes, to the board of chosen freeholders and the chief executive officer of the county within which the municipality is located, and to the board of education and superintendent of any school district, including a regional school district, that is coextensive with the municipality, or of which the municipality is a constituent.  The urban renewal entity, at the time an application is made, shall provide notice of the application submission to the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs, which shall post the notice on the Internet website of the department.  The application shall be in a form, and shall certify to those facts and data, as shall be required by the municipality, and shall include but not be limited to: a.     A general statement of the nature of the proposed project, that the undertaking conforms to all applicable municipal ordinances, and that the project accords with the redevelopment plan and master plan of the municipality, or, in the case of a redevelopment relocation housing project, provides for the relocation of residents displaced or to be displaced from a redevelopment area, or, in the case of a low and moderate income housing project, the housing units are restricted to occupation by low and moderate income households. b.    A description of the proposed project outlining the area included and a description of each unit thereof if the project is to be undertaken in units and setting forth architectural and site plans as required. c.     A statement prepared by a qualified architect or engineer of the estimated cost of the proposed project in the detail required, including the estimated cost of each unit to be undertaken. d.    The source, method and amount of money to be subscribed through the investment of private capital, setting forth the amount of stock or other securities to be issued therefor or the extent of capital invested and the proprietary or ownership interest obtained in consideration therefor. e.     A fiscal plan for the project outlining a schedule of annual gross revenue, the estimated expenditures for operation and maintenance, payments for interest, amortization of debt and reserves, and payments [to the municipality] in lieu of taxes to be made pursuant to a financial agreement to be entered into with the municipality. f.     A proposed financial agreement conforming to the provisions of section 9 of [this act] P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-9). g.    Any other information relevant to determining the financial impact of the project as may be required pursuant to a rule adopted by the Commissioner of Community Affairs or the Local Finance Board. The application shall be addressed and submitted to the mayor or other chief executive officer of the municipality.  Within five business days of receipt of an application, the mayor or other chief executive officer and urban renewal entity shall notify the board of education and superintendent of any school district, including a regional school district, that is coextensive with the municipality, or of which the municipality is a constituent, of the application and the urban renewal entity or municipalitys desire to enter into good faith negotiations for an agreement pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection b. of section 12 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-12).  The superintendent 1[or chief executive of the board of education]1 of any school district, including a regional school district, that is coextensive with the municipality, or of which the municipality is a constituent, shall lead negotiations on behalf of the board of education concerning the agreement with the municipality and urban renewal entity.  The board of education for the school district, including a regional school district, that is coextensive with the municipality, or of which the municipality is a constituent, shall approve or deny the agreement by resolution within 90 days of the date the notification is received concerning the municipalitys desire to enter into good faith negotiations for an agreement pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection b. of section 12 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-12).  If an agreement is not entered pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection b. of section 12 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-12) within 90 days, the municipality shall continue to process the application. The mayor or other chief executive officer shall, within 60 days of [his] receipt of the application thereafter, submit the application with [his] any recommendations to the municipal governing body.  [The] Simultaneously, the mayor or other chief executive officer of the municipality shall submit copies of any recommendations to the board of county commissioners and the chief executive officer of the county within which the municipality is located and to the board of education and superintendent of any school district, including a regional school district, that is coextensive with the municipality, or of which the municipality is a constituent.  Representatives of the county and school district or districts may submit recommendations to the municipal governing body within 10 days after the date of submittal of the recommendations of the mayor or chief executive officer of the municipality.  After affording representatives of the county and school district, or districts, a 10-day period to review the proposed project and the recommendations of the mayor or chief executive officer of the municipality, and after giving due consideration to the recommendations submitted by all interested parties, the municipal governing body shall by resolution approve or disapprove the application, but in the event of disapproval, changes may be suggested to secure approval. An application may be revised and resubmitted. (cf: P.L.1991, c.431, s.8) 3.    Section 9 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-9) is amended to read as follows: 9.    Every approved project shall be evidenced by a financial agreement between the municipality and the urban renewal entity.  The agreement shall be prepared by the entity and submitted as a separate part of its application for project approval.  The agreement shall not take effect until approved by ordinance of the municipality.  The municipality shall notify the chief financial officer of the county and the clerk to the board of county commissioners of the county within which the municipality is located of the date, time, and place of the public hearing required to be held prior to the passage of the ordinance.  Any amendments or modifications of the agreement made thereafter shall be by mutual consent of the municipality and the urban renewal entity and shall be subject to approval by ordinance of the municipal governing body upon recommendation of the mayor or other chief executive officer of the municipality prior to taking effect. The financial agreement shall be in the form of a contract requiring full performance within 30 years from the date of completion of the project and shall include the following: a.     That the profits of or dividends payable by the urban renewal entity shall be limited according to terms appropriate for the type of entity in conformance with the provisions of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.). b.    That all improvements and land, to the extent authorized pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-12), in the project to be constructed or acquired by the urban renewal entity shall be exempt from taxation as provided in P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.). c.     That the urban renewal entity shall make payments for municipal services as provided in P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.). d.    That the urban renewal entity shall submit annually, within 90 days after the close of its fiscal year, its auditor's reports to the mayor and governing body of the municipality, in which the urban renewal entity shall certify to the mayor and the governing body of the municipality the number of school-age children residing in the approved project who are attending a public school.  The urban renewal entity, at the time the auditors reports are submitted, shall provide copies of the reports to the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs, which shall post the reports on the departments Internet website. e.     That the urban renewal entity shall, upon request, permit inspection of property, equipment, buildings, and other facilities of the entity, and also permit examination and audit of its books, contracts, records, documents, and papers by authorized representatives of the municipality or the State. f.     That in the event of any dispute between the parties matters in controversy shall be resolved by arbitration in the manner provided in the financial agreement. g.    That operation under the financial agreement shall be terminable by the urban renewal entity in the manner provided by P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.). h.    That the urban renewal entity shall at all times prior to the expiration or other termination of the financial agreement remain bound by the provisions of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.). The financial agreement shall contain detailed representations and covenants by the urban renewal entity as to the manner in which it proposes to use, manage, or operate the project.  The financial agreement shall further set forth the method for computing gross revenue for the urban renewal entity, the method of determining insurance, operating and maintenance expenses paid by a tenant which are ordinarily paid by a landlord, the plans for financing the project, including the estimated total project cost, the amortization rate on the total project cost, the source of funds, the interest rates to be paid on the construction financing, the source and amount of paid-in capital, the terms of mortgage amortization or payment of principal on any mortgage, a good faith projection of initial sales prices of any condominium units and expenses to be incurred in promoting and consummating such sales, and the rental schedules and lease terms to be used in the project.  Any financial agreement may allow the municipality to levy an annual administrative fee, not to exceed two percent of the annual service charge for public services. (cf: P.L.2025, c.91, s.1) 4.    Section 12 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-12) is amended to read as follows: 12.  The rehabilitation or improvements made in the development or redevelopment of a redevelopment area or area appurtenant thereto or for a redevelopment relocation housing project, pursuant to P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.), shall be exempt from taxation for a limited period as hereinafter provided.  When housing is to be constructed, acquired or rehabilitated by an urban renewal entity, the land upon which that housing is situated shall be exempt from taxation for a limited period as hereinafter provided.  The exemption shall be allowed when the clerk of the municipality wherein the property is situated shall certify to the municipal tax assessor that a financial agreement with an urban renewal entity for the development or the redevelopment of the property, or the provision of a redevelopment relocation housing project, or the provision of a low- and moderate-income housing project has been entered into and is in effect as required by P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.). Delivery by the municipal clerk to the municipal tax assessor of a certified copy of the ordinance of the governing body approving the tax exemption and financial agreement with the urban renewal entity shall constitute the required certification.  For each exemption granted pursuant to P.L.2003, c.125 (C.40A:12A-4.1 et al.), upon certification as required hereunder, the tax assessor shall implement the exemption and continue to enforce that exemption without further certification by the clerk until the expiration of the entitlement to exemption by the terms of the financial agreement or until the tax assessor has been duly notified by the clerk that the exemption has been terminated. Within 10 calendar days following the later of the effective date of an ordinance following its final adoption by the governing body approving the tax exemption or the execution of the financial agreement by the urban renewal entity, the municipal clerk shall transmit a certified copy of the ordinance and financial agreement to the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs, the chief financial officer of the county and to the county counsel of the county within which the municipality is located, and to the board of education and the superintendent of any school district coextensive with the municipality or of which the municipality is a constituent, including a regional school district, for informational purposes.  Upon receipt of an ordinance and financial agreement, the Department of Community Affairs shall post the ordinance and agreement on the departments Internet website. Whenever an exemption status changes during a tax year, the procedure for the apportionment of the taxes for the year shall be the same as in the case of other changes in tax exemption status during the tax year.  Tax exemptions granted pursuant to P.L.2003, c.125 (C.40A:12A-4.1 et al.) represent long term financial agreements between the municipality and the urban renewal entity and as such constitute a single continuing exemption from local property taxation for the duration of the financial agreement.  The validity of a financial agreement or any exemption granted pursuant thereto may be challenged only by filing an action in lieu of prerogative writ within 20 days from the publication of a notice of the adoption of an ordinance by the governing body granting the exemption and approving the financial agreement.  Such notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality and in a newspaper of general circulation in the county if different from the municipal newspaper. a.     The financial agreement shall specify the duration of the exemption for urban renewal entities in accordance with the parameters of either paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) of this subsection: (1)   the financial agreement may specify a duration of not more than 30 years from the completion of the entire project, or unit of the project if the project is undertaken in units, or not more than 35 years from the execution of the financial agreement between the municipality and the urban renewal entity; or (2)   for each project undertaken pursuant to a redevelopment agreement which allows the redeveloper to undertake two or more projects sequentially, the financial agreement may specify a duration of not more than 30 years from the completion of a project, or unit of the project if the project is undertaken in units, or not more than 50 years from the execution of the first financial agreement implementing a project under the redevelopment agreement.  As used in this subsection, "redevelopment agreement" means an agreement entered into pursuant to subsection f. of section 8 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-8) between a municipality or redevelopment entity and a redeveloper. A financial agreement may provide for an exemption period of less than 30 years from the completion of the entire project, less than 35 years from the execution of the financial agreement, or less than 50 years from the execution of the first financial agreement implementing a project under the redevelopment agreement.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as requiring a financial agreement for a project undertaken pursuant to a redevelopment agreement which allows the redeveloper to undertake two or more projects sequentially to specify a duration within the parameters of paragraph (2) of this subsection. b.    During the term of any exemption, in lieu of any taxes to be paid on the buildings and improvements of the project and, to the extent authorized pursuant to this section, on the land, the urban renewal entity shall make payment to the municipality of an annual service charge [, which] for public services.  The municipality shall remit a portion of that revenue to the county, and to the school district or districts, as provided hereinafter.  In addition, the municipality may assess an administrative fee, not to exceed two percent of the annual service charge, for the processing of the application.  The annual service charge for [municipal] public services supplied to the project to be paid by the urban renewal entity for any period of exemption, shall be determined as follows: (1)   An annual amount equal to a percentage determined pursuant to this subsection and section 11 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-11), of the annual gross revenue from each unit of the project, if the project is undertaken in units, or from the total project, if the project is not undertaken in units.  The percentage of the annual gross revenue shall not be more than 15 percent in the case of a low- and moderate-income housing project, nor less than 10 percent in the case of all other projects. At the option of the municipality, or where because of the nature of the development, ownership, use, or occupancy of the project or any unit thereof, if the project is to be undertaken in units, the total annual gross rental or gross shelter rent or annual gross revenue cannot be reasonably ascertained, the governing body shall provide in the financial agreement that the annual service charge shall be a sum equal to a percentage determined pursuant to this subsection and section 11 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-11), of the total project cost or total project unit cost determined pursuant to P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.) calculated from the first day of the month following the substantial completion of the project or any unit thereof, if the project is undertaken in units.  The percentage of the total project cost or total project unit cost shall not be more than two percent in the case of a low- and moderate-income housing project and shall not be less than two percent in the case of all other projects. (2)   In either case, the financial agreement shall establish a schedule of annual service charges to be paid over the term of the exemption period, which shall be in stages as follows: (a)   For the first stage of the exemption period, which shall commence with the date of completion of the unit or of the project, as the case may be, and continue for a time of not less than six years nor more than 15 years, as specified in the financial agreement, the urban renewal entity shall pay the municipality an annual service charge for [municipal] public services supplied to the project in an annual amount equal to the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and section 11 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-11).  For the remainder of the period of the exemption, if any, the annual service charge shall be determined as follows: (b)   For the second stage of the exemption period, which shall not be less than one year nor more than six years, as specified in the financial agreement, an amount equal to either the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and section 11 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-11), or 20 percent of the amount of taxes otherwise due on the value of the land and improvements, whichever shall be greater; (c)   For the third stage of the exemption period, which shall not be less than one year nor more than six years, as specified in the financial agreement, an amount equal to either the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and section 11 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-11), or 40 percent of the amount of taxes otherwise due on the value of the land and improvements, whichever shall be greater; (d)   For the fourth stage of the exemption period, which shall not be less than one year nor more than six years, as specified in the financial agreement, an amount equal to either the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and section 11 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-11), or 60 percent of the amount of taxes otherwise due on the value of the land and improvements, whichever shall be greater; and (e)   For the final stage of the exemption period, the duration of which shall not be less than one year and shall be specified in the financial agreement, an amount equal to either the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and section 11 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-11), or 80 percent of the amount of taxes otherwise due on the value of the land and improvements, whichever shall be greater. If the financial agreement provides for an exemption period of less than 30 years from the completion of the entire project, less than 35 years from the execution of the financial agreement, or less than 50 years from the execution of the first financial agreement implementing a project under the redevelopment agreement, the financial agreement shall set forth a schedule of annual service charges for the exemption period which shall be based upon the minimum service charges and staged adjustments set forth in this section. The annual service charge shall be paid to the municipality on a quarterly basis in a manner consistent with the municipality's tax collection schedule.  Revenue derived from an annual service charge pursuant to a financial agreement for municipal purposes, county purposes, or school purposes 1[may] shall1 be used solely and exclusively by the municipality, county, or school district for the purpose of reducing the amount that is required to be raised through the local property tax levy by the municipality for municipal purposes, by the county for county purposes, and by the school district for school district purposes, as appropriate. (3)  Each municipality [which] that enters into a financial agreement on or after the effective date of P.L.2003, c.125 (C.40A:12A-4.1 et al.) shall remit five percent of the annual service charge collected by the municipality to the county in accordance with the provisions of R.S.54:4-74, and the school district or districts, including regional school districts, pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection.  1The remittance requirements pertaining to school districts shall not be applicable to a 100 percent low and moderate income housing project dedicated to housing 100 percent senior citizen occupants, who are persons 62 years of age or older and who qualify as low and moderate income households.1  If the five percent remittance due to the county and the remittance due to the school district or districts, including regional school districts, is not paid when due, the unpaid balance thereof and interest, at the rate of one percent per month accrued thereon, together with attorneys' fees and court costs, may be recovered by the county and school district or districts, including regional school districts, from the municipality in an action filed in a court of competent jurisdiction.  A municipal finance officer certificate may be subject to revocation or suspension pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1988, c.110 (C.40A:9-140.12) for willful or intentional failure, neglect, or refusal to comply with this section.  If the municipality enters into a contract with a board of education pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2023, c.311 (C.18A:7G-15.1a), the municipality shall also remit to the board of education such amounts as may be required under the contract. (4)  (a)  Each municipality, which enters into a financial agreement on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall remit a percentage of the annual service charge to the school district or districts, including regional school districts, immediately upon receipt of that service charge, unless an agreement is entered into pursuant to paragraph (5) of this subsection in lieu of remitting a percentage of the annual service charge to the school district or districts, including regional school districts, either: (i)  within 90 days following the municipalitys receipt of an application pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-8); or (ii)  for a municipality, school district or districts, including regional school districts, and urban renewal entity that seek to modify their agreement pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-4), not less than 60 days prior to the date that the next installment payment is due for any county tax due pursuant to the provisions of R.S.54:4-74. (b)  The amount of the annual service charge to be remitted to the school district or districts, including regional school districts, pursuant to this section shall be: for a residential project, the amount calculated by multiplying the number of school-age children who are attending public school in the municipality or at a school in a regional school district that serves the municipality and who are residing in the approved project as certified by the urban renewal entity in the annual auditors report to the mayor and governing body of the municipality, by the base per pupil amount determined by the Commissioner of Education for the previous school year pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-49); and for a nonresidential project or a project with both residential and nonresidential components, five percent of the annual service charge collected by the municipality or an in-kind contribution equal in value to five percent of the annual service charge.  When an amount is remitted to more than one school district, including regional school districts, the amount shall be divided amongst the districts in proportion to each districts share of the total school tax levy in the municipality. (c)  The payment received by a school district or districts, including regional school districts, pursuant to this section, shall not exceed the percentage of the amount of property taxes, which are distributed to a given school district or districts, including regional school districts. (d)  When a municipality that is a constituent of a regional school district enters into a financial agreement that includes properties within that regional school districts jurisdiction, the remittance to the regional school district shall, notwithstanding subparagraph (b) of this paragraph, be: (i)  distributed to reflect the equalized valuation that would have been contributed by the property subject to a tax exemption to the regional school districts cost apportionment formula absent the tax exemption; and (ii)  calculated to ensure that constituent municipalities of the regional school district that did not approve the financial agreement do not experience an increase in their proportionate share of the regional school districts costs solely as a result of the tax exemption granted by another constituent municipality. Against the annual service charge, the urban renewal entity shall be entitled to credit for the amount, without interest, of the real estate taxes on land paid by it in the last four preceding quarterly installments. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or of the financial agreement, the minimum annual service charge shall be the amount of the total taxes levied against all real property in the area covered by the project in the last full tax year in which the area was subject to taxation, and the minimum annual service charge shall be paid in each year in which the annual service charge calculated pursuant to this section or the financial agreement would be less than the minimum annual service charge. (5)  A municipality, in lieu of remitting a percentage of the annual service charge to the school district or districts, including regional school districts, may enter into an agreement with a school district or districts, including regional school districts, and urban renewal entity to provide one or more special projects for the school district or districts, including regional school districts. c.     All exemptions granted pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.) shall terminate at the time prescribed in the financial agreement. Upon the termination of the exemption granted pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et seq.), the project, all affected parcels, land, and all improvements made thereto shall be assessed and subject to taxation as are other taxable properties in the municipality.  After the date of termination, all restrictions and limitations upon the urban renewal entity shall terminate and be at an end upon the entity's rendering its final accounting to and with the municipality. (cf: P.L.2025, c.91, s.2) 5.    Section 3 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.18A:7F-38) is amended to read as follows: 3.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, a school district shall not adopt a budget pursuant to sections 5 and 6 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5 and 18A:7F-6) with an increase in its adjusted tax levy that exceeds, except as provided in subsection e. of section 4 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.18A:7F-39), the tax levy growth limitation calculated as follows: the sum of the prebudget year adjusted tax levy and the adjustment for increases in enrollment multiplied by 2.0 percent, and adjustments for an increase in health care costs, increases in amounts for certain normal and accrued liability pension contributions set forth in sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2009, c.19 amending section 24 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-24) and section 15 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-15) for the year set forth in those sections, less any payment received in the prebudget year pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-12), in the case of an SDA district as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-3), during the 2018-2019 through the 2024-2025 school years, increases to raise a general fund tax levy to an amount that does not exceed its local share, and, in the case of a school district first receiving preschool education aid in the 2025-2026, 2026-2027, or 2027-2028 school years and participating in the pilot program established by the commissioner pursuant to subsection h. of section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54), increases to raise a general fund tax levy for the local share of preschool education costs. b. (1)  The allowable adjustment for increases in enrollment authorized pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall equal the per pupil prebudget year adjusted tax levy multiplied by EP, where EP equals the sum of: (a)   0.50 for each unit of weighted resident enrollment that constitutes an increase from the prebudget year over 1 [%] percent, but not more than 2.5 [%] percent; (b)   0.75 for each unit of weighted resident enrollment that constitutes an increase from the prebudget year over 2.5 [%] percent, but not more than 4 [%] percent; and (c)   1.00 for each unit of weighted resident enrollment that constitutes an increase from the prebudget year over 4 [%] percent. (2)   A school district may request approval from the commissioner to calculate EP equal to 1.00 for any increase in weighted resident enrollment if it can demonstrate that the calculation pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection would result in an average class size that exceeds 10 [%] percent above the facilities efficiency standards established pursuant to P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.). c.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.44) d.  (1)  The allowable adjustment for increases in health care costs authorized pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall equal that portion of the actual increase in total health care costs for the budget year, less any withdrawals from the current expense emergency reserve account for increases in total health care costs, that exceeds 2.0 percent of the total health care costs in the prebudget year, but that is not in excess of the product of the total health care costs in the prebudget year multiplied by the average percentage increase of the State Health Benefits Program, P.L.1961, c.49 (C.52:14-17.25 et seq.), as annually determined by the Division of Pensions and Benefits in the Department of the Treasury. (2)  The allowable adjustment for increases in the amount of normal and accrued liability pension contributions authorized pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall equal that portion of the actual increase in total normal and accrued liability pension contributions for the budget year that exceeds 2.0 percent of the total normal and accrued liability pension contributions in the prebudget year. (3)  In the case of an SDA district, as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-3), in which the prebudget year adjusted tax levy is less than the school district's prebudget year local share as calculated pursuant to section 10 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-52), the allowable adjustment for increases to raise a tax levy that does not exceed the school district's local share shall equal the difference between the prebudget year adjusted tax levy and the prebudget year local share. (4)  In the case of a school district first receiving preschool education aid in the 2025-2026, 2026-2027, or 2027-2028 school years and participating in the pilot program established by the commissioner pursuant to subsection h. of section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54), the allowable adjustment for increases to raise a general fund tax levy for the local share of preschool education costs shall be equal to the actual increase required to provide preschool education under the pilot program less State aid provided pursuant to subsection h. of section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54). A school district first receiving preschool education aid in the 2025-2026 school year and participating in the pilot program established by the commissioner pursuant to subsection h. of section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54) may, prior to the delivery of tax bills pursuant to R.S.54:4-64, recertify to the county board of taxation the sum to be raised in the district during the ensuing school year if the change in the amount to be raised is equal to the district's local share of preschool education costs for that school year. e.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.44) f.     The adjusted tax levy shall be increased or decreased accordingly whenever the responsibility and associated cost of a school district activity is transferred to another school district or governmental entity. (cf: P.L.2025, c.100, s.3) 6.    Section 4 of P.L.1991, c.441 (C.40A:21-4) is amended to read as follows: 4.    The governing body of a municipality may determine to utilize the authority granted under Article VIII, Section I, paragraph 6 of the New Jersey Constitution, and adopt an ordinance setting forth the eligibility or noneligibility of dwellings, multiple dwellings, or commercial and industrial structures, or all of these, for exemptions or abatements, or both, from taxation in areas in need of rehabilitation.  The ordinance may differentiate among these types of structures as to whether the property shall be eligible for exemptions or abatements, or both, within the limitations set forth in P.L.1991, c.441 (C.40A:21-1 et seq.).  With respect to a type of structure, the ordinance shall specify the eligibility of improvements, conversions, or construction, or all of these, for each type of structure.  The ordinance may differentiate for the purposes of determining eligibility pursuant to this section among the various neighborhoods, zones, areas or portions of the designated area in need of rehabilitation. An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section may be amended from time to time.  An amendment to an ordinance shall not affect any exemption, abatement, or tax agreement previously granted and in force prior to the amendment. Application for exemptions and abatements from taxation may be filed pursuant to an ordinance so adopted to take initial effect in the tax year in which the ordinance is adopted, and for tax years thereafter as set forth in P.L.1991, c.441 (C.40A:21-1 et seq.), but no application for exemptions or abatements shall be filed for exemptions or abatements to take initial effect in the eleventh tax year or any tax year occurring thereafter, unless the ordinance is readopted by the governing body pursuant to this section. The municipality shall provide a copy of an ordinance introduced or adopted pursuant to this section, including one amending or repealing an ordinance, to the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs, which shall post the ordinance on the Internet website of the department. (cf: P.L.2007, c.268, s.2) 7.  (New section)  The Commissioner of Education, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Local Government Services, shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), for the calculation and distribution of payments pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection b. of section 12 of P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-12). 8.    This act shall take effect immediately.